California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) Increased by an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the statutory fee, by the director upon the recommendation of the Livestock Identification Advisory Board whenever the board determines that the costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of this division require a greater fee. The advisory board shall approve any increase in fees by a two-thirds vote of its entire membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Similar Brands [20791. - 20797.]

20791.

If the brand records on file with the bureau disclose that two or more brands have been recorded which appear to be so similar as to be misleading or conflicting, the chief may, and upon request of the owner of one of such brands he shall, cause an investigation to be made and a hearing held upon the matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20792.

Notice of the hearing shall be given to each interested person at least 10 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20793.

At the hearing, the chief shall first determine if the brands are so similar as to be misleading or conflicting. The chief shall dismiss the proceedings as to any brands which he finds are not so similar as to be misleading or conflicting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20794.

If, at the hearing, the chief finds that two or more brands have been recorded which are so similar as to be misleading or conflicting, he shall determine which of the conflicting brands has been of record for the longest consecutive period of time. The owner of such brand has the right to continue to use his brand. The conflicting brand shall be canceled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20795.

The owner of a recorded brand may request the chief to make an investigation if there are cattle other than his own which bear a brand so similar to such owner’s brand as to be misleading or conflicting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20796.

If, after the investigation, the chief finds sufficient cause for such action, he may require that the cattle, other than those of the owner of the brand which is recorded, be branded with some other brand which is approved by the chief and recorded pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20797.

Any person who loses his or her right to use a brand as a result of the determination of the chief pursuant to this article may appeal to the secretary within 15 days. The secretary may affirm, reverse, or modify the determination of the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Cattle Record Brands [20901. - 20906.]

20901.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, cattle may be branded pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20902.

A cattle record brand shall be used only for purposes of identification. It is not evidence of ownership.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20903.

A cattle record brand shall not be recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20904.

A cattle record brand may be placed upon either loin in front of the hip and behind the ribs of the animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

20905.

A cattle record brand for dairy cattle of the Holstein, Jersey, Guernsey, Ayrshire, Brown Swiss, Dutch Belted, and Milking Shorthorn breeds may be placed upon the right hip rather than upon the loin.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20906.

A cattle record brand consists of:

(a) Consecutive numerals, letters, or a combination of numerals or letters if placed upon the loin of an animal.

(b) At least three consecutive numerals that constitute a number greater than 200 if placed upon the right hip of an animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Inspection of Cattle [21051. - 21323.]



  ARTICLE 1. Requirements, Generally [21051. - 21070.]

21051.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, cattle shall be inspected as follows:

(a) Whenever cattle are sold or ownership is transferred.

(b) Prior to movement out of any designated modified point-of-origin inspection area, for purposes other than sale or slaughter and no change of ownership is involved, as provided in Section 21111.

(c) Prior to movement out of the state.

(d) Upon entry into a registered feedlot.

(e) Prior to slaughter.

(f) Prior to release or sale from a public stockyard, public saleyard, or public or private cattle sales market.

(g) Prior to release from a posted stockyard or posted saleyard.

(h) Prior to transportation out of a full point-of-origin area, as provided in Section 21141.

(i) Prior to transportation or movement from premises designated as quarantine, restriction, or isolated areas pursuant to Section 9565.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 182, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.3.

(a) Any person who moves or transports any animal without inspection, as required by this chapter, is liable to the director for a civil penalty in the amount of the expenses incurred by the director to investigate and prosecute the violation and, if the violation involved the unlawful taking of animals, the expenses incurred by the director to recover and return the animal or animals to their owner.

(b) If the director finds that a violation of subdivision (a) has occurred, he or she shall calculate the amount of the civil penalty and make demand for payment within 30 days thereof. The respondent may deny liability in whole or in part, in which case the director shall set the matter for hearing before a hearing officer of the department or, at the director’s discretion, pursuant to Section 11502 of the Government Code. The hearing procedure under this subdivision shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The respondent may petition for judicial review of the director’s determination to assess a civil penalty pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure by filing an action within 30 days of the date of service of the director’s decision.

(d) The civil penalty in this section is in addition to any other civil or criminal penalties provided by law.

(e) Any funds collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 644, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.4.

(a) In addition to any other penalty provided by this chapter, the director may levy a civil penalty against any person who violates this chapter of an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation. 

(b) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person who is charged with a violation shall be provided a notice of the violation, shall have an opportunity to be heard, and shall have the right to review the evidence and to present evidence on his or her behalf. 

(c) The decision of the director may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(d) The director shall deposit the funds collected pursuant to this section in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for expenditure as authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   Effective August 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.5.

When brand inspection is not required under Section 21051, any person, upon his request, shall receive brand inspection of cattle. Any such person who requests the inspection shall pay to the director a time and mileage charge established by the director to equal the cost of providing such an inspection.

Nothing in this section shall exempt any person from any other inspection requirements for the same cattle at any later time under Section 21051, nor shall such a person be exempt from any statutory inspection fees provided for by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 375.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for five years following the date of conviction, a person convicted of Section 487a of the Penal Code shall submit to an inspection for any cattle in his or her ownership or care prior to any movement, transportation, or change in ownership. 

(b) A person required to submit to an inspection pursuant to this section shall pay to the secretary a fee, as established by the secretary, for the costs incurred, including the cost of time and mileage, in performing the inspection.

(c) A person required to submit to an inspection who violates a provision of this section shall be charged a civil penalty by the
 secretary of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per animal required to be inspected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 129, Sec. 2.   (AB 1722)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21052.

It is unlawful for any person who owns or has custody of cattle to move, slaughter, release, sell, or receive at a registered feedlot that cattle without the inspection that is required by Section 21051.

For the purposes of this section, a common carrier which transports cattle does not have custody of the cattle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21053.

Inspection is not required prior to transportation from a modified point-of-origin inspection area, or prior to movement if being sold, if the cattle are being moved or shipped direct to one of the following destinations:

(a) A registered feedlot in this state.

(b) A licensed slaughterhouse in this state.

(c) A public salesyard or public cattle sales market in this state that is licensed pursuant to Section 21733 or posted by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Packers and Stockyards Act.

All cattle shipped without inspection prior to transportation under this section shall be inspected at the destination point.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21054.

Inspection is not required in cases where cattle are being transported to or from a fair or livestock exhibit within the state’s boundaries if the shipment is accompanied by a certificate of the manager or an official of the fair or exhibit, which shows all of the following:

(a) Any brands and marks.

(b) The names of the shipper and consignee.

(c) The point of origin and destination of the shipment.

(d) Proof of ownership as defined in Section 16522.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21055.

Inspection is not required prior to slaughter by licensed slaughterers at slaughterhouses where the chief determines it is impossible or impractical to have inspection prior to slaughter. The chief shall, from time to time, designate which slaughterhouses are within this category. Slaughterers at such slaughterhouses shall keep the records which are required by Section 22045. They shall also keep the hides of animals which are so slaughtered until the hides are inspected or released.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21056.

Inspection is not required prior to slaughter of an animal by the producer of the animal pursuant to Section 22002. The hides of such animals shall, however, be retained as provided in Section 21455 and records shall be kept as provided in Section 22008.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21057.

Except as provided in Section 21206, inspection is not required prior to slaughter at a licensed slaughterhouse when the cattle are being shipped direct from one of the following:

(a) A registered feedlot in this state.

(b) A public salesyard or cattle sales market in this state that is licensed pursuant to Section 21733 or posted by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Packers and Stockyards Act of 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.).

(c) Out-of-state when accompanied by proper documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 812, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21058.

All cattle shipped pursuant to Section 21057 shall be accompanied by one of the following:

(a) A bill of sale on an approved form giving the date of sale, the loading point, the name and address of the owner or consignor or both, the destination, the number of animals, the certificate number on which the animals were inspected into the feedlot, the lot number, if any, the name and address of the buyer, the name of the transporter or carrier and the license number of the vehicle used to transport the animals, and the signature of the owner or his or her authorized agent.

(b) A saleyard invoice meeting the requirements of Sections 21744 and 21745. 

(c) A certificate of consignment on an approved form giving the date of sale, the loading point, the name and address of the owner or consignor or both, the destination, the number of animals, the certificate number on which the animals were inspected into the feedlot, the lot number, if any, the name and address of the buyer, the name of the transporter or carrier and the license number of the vehicle used to transport the animals, and the signature of the owner or his or her authorized agent.

(d) A brand inspection certificate or, for states with no inspection, a bill of sale or health certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 812, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21059.

Inspection is not required for pasture-to-pasture movement in the following cases:

(a) When the cattle are moved or transported only between points in the same modified point-of-origin inspection area.

(b) When the cattle are moved or transported across a modified point-of-origin inspection area boundary which bisects the ranch or property of the owner and shipper of the cattle.

(c) When cattle are moved or transported only between points within a full point-of-origin area.

(d) When cattle are moved or transported across a modified point-of-origin inspection area boundary in accordance with regulations adopted by the director which specifically allow the cattle to move under a permit for a distance not to exceed 40 miles from loading point to destination. The director may establish a fee for the permit for a 12-month period. The permit fee shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

(e) When female cattle of the dairy breeds are moved or transported from one grazing or pasture area to another grazing or pasture area and the areas are owned or controlled by the same person. However, this movement shall be accompanied by a certificate of ownership or other proof of ownership document.

The provisions of subdivision (i) of Section 21051 shall take precedence over this section.

This section does not apply to cattle entering a registered feedlot.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 592, Sec. 5.5) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 404, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.

Inspection is not required in cases where the cattle being moved or transported are dairy calves, and such calves meet all of the following classifications:

(a) The calves were born on a dairy farm as defined in Section 32505.

(b) The calves were born to cows of a recognized dairy breed.

(c) The umbilical cord is still a part of, and attached to, the navel of the calf.

(d) The calves will not be moved or transported:

(1) Out of the state.

(2) To a licensed slaughterhouse in this state.

(3) To a public saleyard or public cattle sale market in this state that is licensed pursuant to Section 21733 or posted by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Packers and Stockyards Act of 1921 (7 U.S.C. 201 et seq.). 

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any inspector or peace officer from inspecting any calves when such inspection is necessary in accordance with the provisions of Sections 20432, 20435, 20436, and 20438.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.4.

(a) Inspection is not required in cases where cattle are sold or ownership is transferred under all of the following circumstances:

(1) The individual or entity with a controlling interest in the cattle remains unchanged.

(2) The cattle will not be moved out of state or out of a modified point-of-origin inspection area.

(3) The cattle are associated with either a registered brand or dairy exemption number.

(b) All persons who have ownership in the cattle, including both the transferor and the transferee, shall,
 within 30 days of ownership transfer, self-certify, under penalty of perjury, to the department as to their ownership in the cattle on a form prescribed by the department.

(c) The department may charge a fee to cover the reasonable costs of processing the form identified in subdivision (b), but the fee shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) or the department’s actual costs of conducting these activities.

(d) An owner of cattle that is otherwise exempt from inspection pursuant to this section may elect to have that cattle inspected pursuant to Section 21051.

(e) A violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties described in Section 21051.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 7.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.5.

Any calves not exempt from inspection pursuant to Section 21060, shall be inspected in accordance with the provisions of Sections 21051 and 21052.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.7.

It is unlawful for any person to move or transport any calves exempt from inspection pursuant to Section 21060 without preparing the bill of sale or consignment that is required by Sections 21702 and 21703. Such bill of sale or consignment shall accompany the calves and be retained by the receiver of the calves for at least one year, and such documents shall be presented to any inspector or peace officer upon demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.

The director may make regulations which govern the brand inspection of cattle and hides at slaughterhouses. The regulations may provide for an inspection schedule at each slaughterhouse and include provision for inspection in addition to the basic inspection schedule. Additional inspection services shall be provided on a reimbursement basis at the expense of the slaughterer requesting the additional service and shall not be an added charge to the consignor or seller of the livestock. The fees for the additional service shall be established by regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 775.)
-------------------------------------------

21062.

All cattle shipped to a registered feedlot, licensed slaughterhouse, or licensed or posted livestock salesyard or market in this state for inspection at destination pursuant to this chapter shall be accompanied by a bill of sale, or certificate of consignment. The original document shall be presented to the inspector prior to the inspection of the cattle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21064.

A copy of the document required by Section 21062 shall be kept on file in the office of the registered feedlot, licensed slaughterhouse, or salesyard or market for a period of one year after the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21066.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (h) of Section 21051, all cattle transported within the state for pasture or feeding purposes with no change in ownership shall be accompanied by a certificate of consignment which contains the information specified in Section 21703.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 592, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

21067.

(a) The chief may issue an annual permit to allow cattle to be transported out of this state without the brand inspection required pursuant to this article under all of the following conditions:

(1) The cattle are moved for pasture purposes.

(2) The cattle are moved a distance of not more than 50 miles from the point of origin to the point of destination.

(3) There is no change of ownership of the cattle.

(b) The department may charge a fee to cover its costs in issuing and renewing the annual permit. The fee may not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) The chief may, at any time, revoke a permit and require a brand inspection if he or she determines that this action is necessary to enforce this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 182, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21068.

(a) The secretary may issue a special permit to allow cattle to be transported out-of-state directly for immediate slaughter only, without the brand inspection required pursuant to this article, if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The cattle were inspected previously in a registered feedlot.

(2) The cattle are transported to a licensed slaughterer.

(3) The cattle are accompanied by a permit document issued by the secretary.

(b) The secretary may charge a fee to cover the costs of issuing or renewing an annual permit. The fee may not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) The secretary may, at any time, revoke the permit and require a brand inspection if the secretary determines that this action is necessary to enforce this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21069.

(a) The director may issue an annual release permit to allow cattle to be transported into another state without brand inspection if all of the following conditions exist: 

(1) The state of destination is contiguous to California and it has entered into an inspection agreement with California. 

(2) The shipping point is not more than 50 miles from the destination. 

(3) The cattle are transported to a public posted stockyard or saleyard. 

(4) The cattle are accompanied by a permit document issued by the director. 

(b) The director may charge a fee to cover the cost of issuing or renewing the permit in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100). 

(c) The director may, at any time, revoke the permit and require brand inspection if the director determines that this action is necessary to carry out the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 361, Sec. 3.   Effective August 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

21070.

(a) The secretary may issue an annual exhibition permit to allow cattle to be transported out of the state during the permit year without the inspection required pursuant to this article, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The cattle are inspected before issuance of the permit.

(2) The cattle are only moved for exhibition purposes.

(3) There is no change in ownership of the cattle.

(4) The cattle return to the state of origin.

(5) The cattle have an official form of identification.

(b) The department may charge a fee to cover its costs in issuing and renewing the annual exhibition permit. The fee shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per head.

(c) The department shall accept the exhibition permits of other states and allow cattle to return to their state of origin under those permits without an inspection.

(d) The secretary may, at any time, revoke an exhibition permit if the chief determines that this action is necessary to enforce this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 125.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Feedlot Registration [21081. - 21084.]

21081.

The operator of a feedlot as defined in Section 20013 shall register each such feedlot with the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21082.

Registration consists of filing of a registration application with the bureau which shall show the location of the feedlot, its capacity, the names and addresses of the owners, and any other information which the director may require.

This registration shall be filed and approved by the director in order for a feedlot to receive cattle for inspection in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 21051 and subdivision (a) of Section 21053, or to ship cattle in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 21057.

Feedlots operating on and after the effective date of this section shall have 15 days from that date in which to apply for registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.

The director may cancel the registration of any feedlot from which cattle were shipped without the inspection required by subdivision (d) of Section 21051. When such cancellation occurs, the cattle from any such feedlot shall be inspected at slaughter in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 21051.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21084.

The director may cancel the registration of any feedlot in which the operator has not fed cattle for slaughter for a period of 90 days. When a feedlot has had its registration canceled for this reason, a new application shall be submitted to the Bureau of Livestock Identification for registration when cattle are again fed for slaughter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 184.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Modified Point-of-Origin Inspection Areas [21111. - 21112.]

21111.

The secretary shall, by regulation, establish and maintain a modified point-of-origin inspection area whenever the cattle producers owning cattle in the affected area request the action by a two-thirds vote of those cattle producers, who are either property taxpayers, lessees, or residents of the affected area and who are present at a public hearing held at a central location in the area. The secretary shall hold a statewide hearing within sixty days of the passage of this act, and upon written request or petition signed by at least 25 cattle producers owning cattle in the affected area thereafter, to determine what areas wish to consider establishing a modified point-of-origin inspection area. Based on the testimony presented at these hearings, the secretary shall conduct local hearings in those areas where significant interest exists. The cost of each local hearing shall be borne by the producers in the area based on a written agreement between producers in the area and the secretary. Notice of the local hearing shall be publicized by the department at least 30 days prior to the hearing date through local publications and radio; shall be posted at all sales yards, slaughter plants and feedlots in the area; and shall be circulated to all known beef cattle and dairy cattle associations having producer members in the areas. The two-thirds vote of those attending pertains to these local hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 568, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21111.5.

Cattle producers owning cattle in the affected area may, upon written request or petition signed by at least 25 cattle producers owning cattle in that area, request that the secretary repeal regulations establishing a modified point-of-origin inspection area pursuant to Section 21111 in the manner prescribed by the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21112.

A modified point-of-origin inspection area may consist of one or more counties or geographical areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Point of Origin Inspection Area [21141. - 21142.]

21141.

The secretary shall, by regulation, establish and maintain a full point-of-origin inspection area whenever the cattle producers owning cattle in the affected area request this action by a two-thirds vote of those present at a public hearing held at a central location in the area. The secretary shall hold the local public hearing upon the receipt of written requests or petitions signed by at least 25 cattle producers in the affected area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 568, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21141.5.

A full point-of-origin inspection area may consist of one or more counties or geographical areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 210, Sec. 21.   Effective May 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21142.

Cattle producers owning cattle in the affected area may, upon written request or petition signed by at least 25 cattle producers owning cattle in that area, request that the secretary repeal regulations establishing a full point-of-origin inspection area pursuant to Section 21141 in the manner prescribed by the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 568, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Procedure [21171. - 21175.]

21171.

Inspection of cattle consists of the examination of the cattle for all brands and marks, and, in the case of unbranded cattle, for natural marks, sex, and breed. It also includes the issuance of a certificate of inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21172.

If inspection is required, the person that requests the inspection shall notify the inspector. The inspector shall make his inspection as soon as practicable after he is notified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21172.2.

The director may, by regulation, provide that any person who ships any cattle from a modified point-of-origin inspection area, for inspection at destination, is required to notify the local brand inspector prior to shipment of such cattle, if he finds, following a public hearing in the area, such requirement is needed to protect cattle owners from losses by theft or straying of their livestock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21172.5.

The brand inspection of cattle as provided for in this chapter shall be conducted in such a way as to minimize the disruption of normal cattle raising operations. Both the feedlot management and personnel and the brand inspector shall jointly handle the cattle at a time and in a manner that is not detrimental to the livestock involved. However, nothing in this section shall prevent any cattle from being brand inspected pursuant to Section 21051.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21173.

If requested to do so, the person in charge of the animals shall furnish the inspector with a list of the brands and marks on them to the best of his ability.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21174.

If, upon inspection, there is found any animal which does not bear the recorded brand of the person that presents the animal for inspection, such person shall show the inspector a bill of sale, certificate of inspection, dairy exemption number, or other proof of ownership of such animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 318.)
-------------------------------------------

21175.

The shipper or person in charge of cattle being shipped or offered for inspection is responsible for sorting out stray animals and identifying such strays to the brand inspector prior to inspection.

(a) Any expense for feed and transportation incurred in the recovery of stray animals shipped without inspection, or shipped for inspection at destination, without the knowledge and consent of the owner, shall be recovered from the person responsible for the shipment.

(b) Any person failing to cut out or identify stray animals which are shipped without inspection or shipped for inspection at destination shall pay a penalty upon a first violation of fifty dollars ($50) for each animal; upon a second violation within the same 12-month period, a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each animal; upon a third violation within the same 12-month period, a penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) for each animal; and upon the fourth or subsequent violation within the same 12-month period, a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each animal to the Bureau of Livestock Identification which is in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(c) For purposes of determining subsequent violations, each shipment of cattle to a single destination point in one calendar day constitutes one violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 558, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Certificate of Inspection [21201. - 21208.]

21201.

It is unlawful for any inspector to issue a certificate of inspection unless he personally made the inspection between sunrise and sunset.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21202.

If satisfied that the person that offers the cattle for inspection is in lawful possession of them, the inspector shall issue a certificate of inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21203.

The certificate of inspection shall be signed by the inspector and shall show all of the following:

(a) The place and date of inspection and the number of animals inspected.

(b) The sex, the brand, if any, on each branded animal recorded in the name of the owner of the animal, or the marks and brands under which the animal was offered for inspection, and such additional marks and brands as may be required by the chief.

(c) The sex, natural marks, and breed of unbranded animals.

(d) If the animals are to be transported, the names of the shipper and of the consignee and the origin and destination of the shipment.

(e) If the animals are to be transported, the length of time necessary to move the shipment between the point of inspection and the point of destination. The inspector shall determine the amount of time needed for this purpose, based upon the information provided to him at the time of inspection.

Such certificate shall only be valid for transportation purposes during the period of time specified thereon by the inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21204.

One copy of the certificate of inspection shall accompany the shipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21205.

Unless the inspector who issued the certificate is notified and approves, it is unlawful for any person to remove any animal and substitute another for it, or to add other animals or take animals away from any lot of cattle for which a certificate has been issued until after the shipment or slaughter is completed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.

Cattle which are shipped for slaughter from either of the following points of origin may be inspected by the director without any charge prior to slaughter on a monitoring basis sufficient to assure that uninspected cattle are not being slaughtered:

(a) Registered feedlots.

(b) Public salesyards or livestock markets in this state that are licensed by the state or posted by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Packers and Stockyards Act.

The director shall adopt the regulations necessary to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21207.

Whenever the director upon the inspection provided for by Section 21206 finds any cattle that have not been inspected in accordance with subdivisions (d), (f) and (g) of Section 21051, he shall inspect the cattle and charge for the inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21208.

In addition to any other penalty, any person who slaughters cattle at a slaughter plant without the brand inspection required by this chapter, shall pay a penalty fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each head of cattle so slaughtered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Duplicate Brand Inspection Certificates [21231. - 21238.]

21231.

Unless the shipment is released pursuant to Section 21233 or 21744, no common carrier, or owner or driver of any conveyance shall receive for transporation or transport any cattle until they have been inspected, and the carrier, owner, or driver has been furnished with duplicate brand inspection certificates that are signed by an inspector, which show all of the following:

(a) Any brands and marks.

(b) The names of the shipper and consignee.

(c) The origin and destination of the shipment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21232.

The duplicate brand inspection certificate shall accompany to destination any cattle which are transported over a public thoroughfare.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21233.

The chief may release, or provide for the release of, cattle without the inspection which is required by Section 21231, but inspection shall be made en route or at the point of destination. The owner shall keep such cattle segregated until they are inspected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21236.

Any brand inspection certificate which has been altered, defaced, or changed is void. An inspector may, however, indicate on an inspection certificate any number of cattle which are sold by the holder of the inspection certificate, if he signs and dates such alterations on the inspection certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

21237.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 21236, it is unlawful for any person to alter, deface, or change any brand inspection certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21238.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 21236, it is unlawful for any person to possess, or present to an inspector or any peace officer, any brand inspection certificate that has been altered, defaced, or otherwise changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------


